Montana, session 2025, SB408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Legislative bill drafting files. (1) Legislative bill drafting files are public
records as defined in 2-6-1002 and must be provided on request pursuant to Title 2, chapter 6, part 10.
(2) A legislative bill drafting file contains the history of the drafting, preparation, and process from
the request to the introduction of a bill draft. The contents of a bill drafting file may include but are not limited to:
(a) draft versions of a bill prior to introduction;
(b) bills or laws from other states;
(c) uniform acts or model legislation from any source;
(d) reports, articles, papers, or any other research conducted on the topic of the bill draft;
(e) legal analysis;
(f) e-mails and other communications between the legislator and the bill drafter;
(g) e-mails and other communications between the bill drafter and any third party, whether or not
the legislator was included in those communications; and
(h) any other resources or materials collected or compiled during the course of drafting the bill.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 2, chapter 6, part 10, and the provisions of Title 2, chapter 6, part 10, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 408